Georgia, session 2025_26, HB718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The number of women playing and enjoying golf in Georgia is increasing at a rapid
pace;
(2) The popularity of golf among Georgia women is at an all-time high and still
climbing;
(3) According to the National Golf Foundation, 23 percent of all golfers are women; and
H. B. 718
- 1 -

LC 59 0125
(4) It is now abundantly clear that the old adage that golf stands for 'Gentlemen Only,
Ladies Forbidden' is no longer appropriate.
(b) The first week in April of each year is designated as 'Women's Golf Week' in Georgia."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 718
- 2 -